Connecticut, session 2026, HB05072.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of ___ dollars be appropriated to the Department of
Education, from the General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, for the costs to local boards of education for regional agricultural
science and technology centers.